New York, session 2025-2026, S189.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 2 97-bbbbb to read as follows: 3 § 97-bbbbb. Police canine vest fund. 1. There is hereby established in 4 the joint custody of the state comptroller and the commissioner of taxa- 5 tion and finance a fund to be known as the "police canine vest fund". 6 2. The fund shall consist of all moneys credited, appropriated or 7 transferred thereto from any other fund or source. Nothing contained in 8 this section shall prevent the state from receiving grants, gifts or 9 bequests for the purposes of the fund as defined in this section and 10 depositing them into the fund according to law. 11 3. Moneys from the fund shall be used for the purpose of purchasing, 12 maintaining, repairing and replacing soft body ballistic armor vests and 13 other protective equipment for state police and municipal department 14 police canines utilized in the performance of police duties, as well as 15 the purchasing and training of such police canines. 16 4. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit 17 the division of state police or any municipal police department from 18 expending its own funds for ballistic armor vests or other protective 19 equipment for police canines. 20 5. A municipal police department utilizing one or more police canines 21 may apply to the superintendent of the state police for the purchase, 22 maintenance, repair or replacement of police canine vests and other 23 protective equipment as provided in subdivision three of this section. 24 The superintendent of the state police shall establish a process for EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00508-01-5 S. 189 2 1 application by such police departments and for selection of departments 2 to receive police canine vests or other protective equipment. 3 6. Moneys shall be paid out of the fund on the audit and warrant of 4 the state comptroller on vouchers approved by the superintendent of 5 state police. Any interest received by the comptroller on moneys on 6 deposits in the fund shall be retained in and become part of such fund. 7 No money from such fund may be withdrawn, transferred, or used by any 8 person for any purpose other than as permitted by this section. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 10 have become a law and shall apply to all claims filed on and after such 11 effective date. Effective immediately the addition, amendment and/or 12 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 13 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 14 on or before such date.